Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2501
Ride-sharing arrangement, defined.

For purposes of sections 60-2501 to 60-2508, ride-sharing arrangement shall mean the carrying of more than one, but not more than fifteen passengers by motor vehicle on any public road or highway, either regularly or occasionally, with or without compensation, but not for profit, and the carriage of such passengers is incidental to another purpose of the motor vehicle operator. The term shall include ride-sharing arrangements commonly known as carpools, vanpools, and buspools.

Laws 1981, LB 50, § 1.